California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(2) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to permit a physician and surgeon to charge more than he or she was charged for the laboratory service by the clinical laboratory providing the service unless the additional charge is for service actually rendered by the physician and surgeon to the patient.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 5.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

655.7.

(a) (1) A person licensed under this division or under an initiative act referred to in this division shall not charge, bill, or otherwise solicit payment, directly or indirectly, for anatomic pathology services if those services were not actually rendered by that person or under his or her direct supervision.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a clinical laboratory may seek payment for anatomic pathology services provided directly or through arrangements with a physician and surgeon in compliance with Article 18 (commencing with Section 2400) of Chapter 5 or if it is required to send a sample to another clinical laboratory for specialized testing or services and if that clinical laboratory has performed the services, directly or through arrangements with a physician and surgeon as set forth in this subdivision, described in subdivision (e) related to that sample.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a clinical laboratory may bill for anatomic pathology services that were performed by an affiliated clinical laboratory. For purposes of this section, an “affiliated clinical laboratory” means a clinical laboratory that is wholly owned by, is the parent company of, or is under common ownership with, the clinical laboratory billing for the anatomic pathology services. For purposes of this section, “wholly owned” means 100 percent ownership directly or through one or more subsidiaries, and “common ownership” means 100 percent ownership by a common parent company.

(b) A clinical laboratory or a physician and surgeon performing anatomic pathology services shall seek payment for those services solely from the following:

(1) The patient.

(2) The insurer, health care service plan, or other third-party payer responsible for payment of the services.

(3) The hospital, public health clinic, or nonprofit health clinic ordering the services.

(4) The clinical laboratory that sent the sample for specialized testing or services only if that clinical laboratory has performed the services, directly or through arrangements with a physician and surgeon in compliance with Article 18 (commencing with Section 2400) of Chapter 5, described in subdivision (e) related to that sample.

(5) A governmental agency or its specified public or private agent, agency, or organization responsible for payment of the services.

(c) No person is required to reimburse a person licensed under this division or under an initiative act referred to in this division for a charge or claim made in violation of this section.

(d) This section shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) A person who, or a clinical laboratory that, contracts directly with a health care service plan licensed pursuant to Section 1349 of the Health and Safety Code, if services are to be provided to enrollees of the plan on a prepaid basis.

(2) A person who, or a clinic that, provides anatomic pathology services without charge to the patient, or on a sliding scale payment basis if the patient’s charge for services is determined by the patient’s ability to pay.

(3) Health care programs operated by public entities, including, but not limited to, colleges and universities.

(4) Health care programs operated by private educational institutions to serve the health care needs of their students.

(5) A person who, or a clinic that, contracts with an employer to provide medical services to its employees if the anatomic pathology services relating to the examination of gynecologic slides are provided under the contract.

(e) For the purposes of this section, the term “anatomic pathology services” means any of the following:

(1) Histopathology, meaning the gross and microscopic examination of organ tissue performed by a physician and surgeon or under the supervision of a physician and surgeon.

(2) Cytopathology, meaning the examination of cells from fluids, aspirates, washings, brushings, or smears, including the Pap test examination, performed by a physician and surgeon or under the supervision of a physician and surgeon.

(3) Hematology, meaning the microscopic evaluation of bone marrow aspirates and biopsies performed by a physician and surgeon, or under the supervision of a physician and surgeon, and peripheral blood smears when the attending or treating physician and surgeon or technologist requests that a blood smear be reviewed by a pathologist.

(4) Subcellular pathology and molecular pathology, when required to be reviewed by a pathologist.

(5) Surgical pathology, meaning the gross and microscopic examination of organ tissue performed by a physician and surgeon or under the supervision of a physician and surgeon.

(6) Transfusion medicine or blood banking services performed by a pathologist.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 656, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

655.8.

(a) It is unlawful for any person licensed under this division or under any initiative act referred to in this division to charge, bill, or otherwise solicit payment from any patient, client, customer, or third-party payer for performance of the technical component of Computerized Tomography (CT), Positron Emission Tomography (PET), or Magnetic Resonance Imaging (MRI) diagnostic imaging services if those services were not actually rendered by the licensee or a person under his or her supervision.

(b) Radiological facilities or imaging centers performing the technical component of CT, PET, or MRI diagnostic imaging services shall directly bill either the patient or the responsible third-party payer for such services rendered by those facilities. Radiological facilities or imaging centers shall not bill the licensee who requests the services.

(c) This section shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) Any person who, or radiological facility or imaging center that, contracts directly with a health care service plan licensed pursuant to Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Any person who, or clinic that, provides diagnostic imaging services without charge to the patient, or on a sliding scale payment basis if the patient’s charge for services is determined by the patient’s ability to pay.

(3) Health care programs operated by public entities, including, but not limited to, colleges and universities.

(4) Health care programs operated by private educational institutions to serve the health care needs of their students.

(5) Any person who, or clinic that, contracts with an employer to provide medical services to employees of the employer if the diagnostic imaging services are provided under the contract.

(6) Diagnostic imaging services that are performed within a physician and surgeon’s office, as defined in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 650.01, or the office of a group practice, as defined in paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 650.01.

(d) Nothing in this section prohibits a licensee or a physician entity from billing globally for professional and technical

 components if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) Neither the physician, or any member of his or her medical group, nor the physician entity has ordered the diagnostic imaging services.

(2) The physician, or a member of his or her medical group, or the physician entity provides the professional interpretation of the diagnostic imaging service.

(e) Nothing in subdivision (d) is intended to authorize or permit an imaging center to engage in the practice of medicine or exercise other professional rights, privileges, or powers in violation of Section 2400 of the Business and Professions Code.

(f) For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(1) “Physician entity” means a professional medical corporation formed pursuant to Section 2406 or a general partnership that consists entirely of physicians and surgeons or professional medical corporations.

(2) “Responsible third-party payer” means any person or entity who is responsible to pay for CT, PET, or MRI services provided to a patient.

(3) “Supervision” means that the referring licensee is providing the level of supervision set forth in paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of Section 410.32 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(4) “Technical component” includes services other than those provided by a physician and surgeon for the CT, PET, or MRI including personnel, materials, space, equipment, and other facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 469, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

656.

Whenever any person has engaged, or is about to engage, in any acts or practices that constitute, or will constitute, a violation of this article, the superior court in and for the county wherein the acts or practices take place, or are about to take place, may issue an injunction, or other appropriate order, restraining the conduct on application of the California State Board of Optometry, the Medical Board of California, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the Attorney General, or the district attorney of the county.

The proceedings under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

The remedy provided for in this section shall be in addition to, and not a limitation upon, the authority provided by any other provision of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 12.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

657.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Californians spend more than one hundred billion dollars ($100,000,000,000) annually on health care.

(2) In 1994, an estimated 6.6 million of California’s 32 million residents did not have any health insurance and were ineligible for Medi-Cal.

(3) Many of California’s uninsured cannot afford basic, preventative health care resulting in these residents relying on emergency rooms for urgent health care, thus driving up health care costs.

(4) Health care should be affordable and accessible to all Californians.

(5) The public interest dictates that uninsured Californians have access to basic, preventative health care at affordable prices.

(b) To encourage the prompt payment of health or medical care claims, health care providers are hereby expressly authorized to grant discounts in health or medical care claims when payment is made promptly within time limits prescribed by the health care providers or institutions rendering the service or treatment.

(c) Notwithstanding any provision in any health care service plan contract or insurance contract to the contrary, health care providers are hereby expressly authorized to grant discounts for health or medical care provided to any patient the health care provider has reasonable cause to believe is not eligible for, or is not entitled to, insurance reimbursement, coverage under the Medi-Cal program, or coverage by a health care service plan for the health or medical care provided. Any discounted fee granted pursuant to this section shall not be deemed to be the health care provider’s usual, customary, or reasonable fee for any other purposes, including, but not limited to, any health care service plan contract or insurance contract.

(d) “Health care provider,” as used in this section, means any person licensed or certified pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code, or licensed pursuant to the Osteopathic Initiative Act, or the Chiropractic Initiative Act, or licensed pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 1440) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code; and any clinic, health dispensary, or health facility, licensed pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 20, Sec. 1.   Effective April 14, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.5. Open Payments Database Notices [660. - 665.]

660.

For purposes of this article, all of the following definitions apply:

(a) “Drug or device company” means a manufacturer, developer, or distributor of pharmaceutical drugs or any device used in the context of the physician and surgeon’s or osteopathic physician and surgeon’s practice.

(b) “Health care employer” means an employer that provides health care services and that employs a physician and surgeon or an osteopathic physician and surgeon.

(c) “Open Payments database” means the database created to allow the public to search for data provided pursuant to Section
 1320a-7h of Title 42 of the United States Code and that is maintained by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(d) “Physician and surgeon” includes a physician and surgeon licensed pursuant to the Medical Practice Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000)) or an osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed by the Osteopathic Medical Board of California under the Osteopathic Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 750, Sec. 1.   (AB 1278)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

661.

(a) A physician and surgeon shall provide to each patient at the initial office visit a written or electronic notice of the Open Payments database. The written notice shall include a signature from the patient or a patient representative and the date of signature.

(b) The written or electronic notice shall contain the following text:

“The Open Payments database is a federal tool used to search payments made by drug and device companies to physicians and teaching hospitals. It can be found at https://openpaymentsdata.cms.gov.”

(c) A physician and surgeon shall include in the electronic records for the patient a record of the notice pursuant to this section.

(d) If a physician and surgeon does not maintain electronic records, the physician and surgeon shall include the notice pursuant to this section in the written records.

(e) A physician and surgeon shall give to the patient or patient representative a copy of the signed and dated notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 750, Sec. 1.   (AB 1278)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

663.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any law, except as provided in subdivision (c), a physician and surgeon shall post in each location where the physician and surgeon practices, in an area that is likely to be seen by all persons who enter the office, an Open Payments database notice.

(2) The Open Payments database notice described in paragraph (1) shall include both of the following:

(A) An internet website link to the Open Payments database.

(B) The following text:

“For informational purposes
 only, a link to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) Open Payments web page is provided here. The federal Physician Payments Sunshine Act requires that detailed information about payment and other payments of value worth over ten dollars ($10) from manufacturers of drugs, medical devices, and biologics to physicians and teaching hospitals be made available to the public.”

(b) Beginning January 1, 2024, if an internet website is used for a physician and surgeon’s practice, then the physician and surgeon shall conspicuously post the Open Payments database notice described in subdivision (a) on that internet website, except as otherwise authorized under subdivision (c).

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), if a physician and surgeon subject to this section is employed by a health care employer, the health care employer shall be responsible for meeting the requirements of this section.

(d) A posting required by this section may be placed within the same notice posted by the physician and surgeon in accordance with Section 138 or 2026.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 750, Sec. 1.   (AB 1278)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

664.

A violation of this article shall constitute unprofessional conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 750, Sec. 1.   (AB 1278)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

665.

This article does not apply to a physician and surgeon working in a hospital emergency room.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 750, Sec. 1.   (AB 1278)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Nursing [675. - 679.]

675.

Every person, firm, association, partnership, or corporation offering a course of instruction in any type of nursing, including vocational nursing or practical nursing, which course of instruction is not accredited by the Board of Registered Nursing or by the Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians and completion of which will not qualify a person to take any examination given by either board shall notify an applicant for admission thereto that the course of instruction is not accredited by either board and that completion thereof will not qualify the person to take any examination given by either board.

The notice required by this section shall be in writing in at least 12-point boldface type, and in no event less than two points larger than the type in any other portion of the notice or contract, and shall be given to an applicant prior to the signing of any contract by the applicant or, if no contract is signed, prior to the making of any deposit or other payment by the applicant.

If an applicant is required to sign a contract in order to enroll in the course of instruction, the notice required by this section shall be contained in the contract directly above the place for the applicant’s signature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 759, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

676.

The provisions contained in this article shall not apply to inservice training programs given in institutions for the purpose of qualifying persons to work therein, to public schools, to private schools or institutions offering advanced nursing education to registered nurses or vocational nurses licensed in the United States, or to schools conducted by any recognized church or denomination for the purpose of training the adherents of such church or denomination in the care of the sick in accordance with its religious tenets.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1490.)
-------------------------------------------

677.

Every person, firm, association, partnership, or corporation subject to the provisions of this article shall maintain records for at least three years, which records shall be open to inspection by investigators of the Division of Investigation of the department and by peace officers acting in their official capacity.

The records shall include the names and address of the persons admitted to the course of instruction and a copy of any written contract signed by such a person or, if no contract is signed, a copy of the written notice given to such person.

A correspondence school whose home office is located outside of this state need maintain the foregoing records only for persons residing in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 716.)
-------------------------------------------

678.

The failure to give the notice required by this article shall make any contract entered into between the parties null and void.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1490.)
-------------------------------------------

679.

Any person, firm, association, partnership, or corporation who violates this article is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1490.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.5. Health Care Practitioners [680. - 688.]

680.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a health care practitioner shall disclose, while working, his or her name and practitioner’s license status, as granted by this state, on a name tag in at least 18-point type. A health care practitioner in a practice or an office, whose license is prominently displayed, may opt to not wear a name tag. If a health care practitioner or a licensed clinical social
 worker is working in a psychiatric setting or in a setting that is not licensed by the state, the employing entity or agency shall have the discretion to make an exception from the name tag requirement for individual safety or therapeutic concerns. In the interest of public safety and consumer awareness, it shall be unlawful for any person to use the title “nurse” in reference to himself or herself and in any capacity, except for an individual who is a registered nurse or a licensed vocational nurse, or as otherwise provided in Section 2800. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a certified nurse assistant from using his or her title.

(b) Facilities licensed by the State Department of Social Services, the State Department of Public Health, or the State Department of Health Care Services shall develop and implement policies to ensure that health care practitioners providing care in those facilities are in compliance with subdivision (a). The
 State Department of Social Services, the State Department of Public Health, and the State Department of Health Care Services shall verify through periodic inspections that the policies required pursuant to subdivision (a) have been developed and implemented by the respective licensed facilities.

(c) For purposes of this article, “health care practitioner” means any person who engages in acts that are the subject of licensure or regulation under this division or under any initiative act referred to in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   (AB 82)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

680.5.

(a) (1) A health care practitioner licensed under Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) shall communicate to a patient his or her name, state-granted practitioner license type, and highest level of academic degree, by one or both of the following methods:

(A) In writing at the patient’s initial office visit.

(B) In a prominent display in an area visible to patients in his or her office.

(2) An individual licensed under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700) or Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 4000) is not required to disclose the highest level of academic degree he or she holds.

(b) A person licensed under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) or under the Osteopathic Act, who is certified by (1) an American Board of Medical Specialties member board, (2) a board or association with requirements equivalent to a board described in paragraph (1) approved by that person’s medical licensing authority, or (3) a board or association with an Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education approved postgraduate training program that provides complete training in the person’s specialty or subspecialty, shall disclose the
 name of the board or association by either method described in subdivision (a).

(c) A health care practitioner who chooses to disclose the information required by subdivisions (a) and (b) pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall present that information in at least 24-point type in the following format: HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER INFORMATION1. Name and license .2. Highest level of academic degree .3. Board certification (ABMS/MBC) .(d) This section shall not apply to the following health care practitioners:

(1) A person who provides professional medical services to enrollees of a health care service plan that exclusively contracts with a single medical group in a specific geographic area to provide or arrange for professional medical services for the enrollees of the plan.

(2) A person who works in a facility licensed under Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code or in a clinical laboratory licensed under Section 1265.

(3) A person licensed under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1200), Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 3300), Chapter 8.3 (commencing with Section 3700), Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 4800), Chapter 13 (commencing with
 Section 4980), Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 4990.1), or Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 4999.10).

(e) A health care practitioner, who provides information regarding health care services on an Internet Web site that is directly controlled or administered by that health care practitioner or his or her office personnel, shall prominently display on that Internet Web site the information required by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 381, Sec. 5.   (SB 146)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

681.

(a) Commencing July 1, 2000, every person licensed pursuant to this division who collects human biological specimens for clinical testing or examination, shall secure, or ensure that his or her employees, agents, or contractors secure, those specimens in a locked container when those specimens are placed in a public location outside of the custodial control of the licensee, or his or her employees, agents, or contractors.

(b) Containers used for human biological specimens put into
 use on or after January 1, 2001, shall be marked “Caution: Biohazardous Material - Please Do Not Touch or Handle,” or words of similar meaning.

(c) This section shall not apply where the biological specimens have been placed in the mail in compliance with all applicable laws and regulations.

(d) The licensing board having jurisdiction of the licensee may impose appropriate sanctions for violations of this section, including, if otherwise authorized by the licensing act, the imposition of a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(e) As used in this section, “locked container” means a secure container that is fully enclosed and locked by a padlock, key lock, combination lock, or similar locking device.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 748, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

682.

An individual authorized to prescribe emergency contraception who issues a prescription or order for emergency contraception drug therapy as a result of a patient contact by telephone or electronic means may not charge an administrative fee or fees totaling more than ten dollars ($10) for emergency contraception drug therapy services. This limitation is not intended to interfere with other contractually agreed-upon terms between an individual prescriber and a health care service plan, insurer, or disability insurer for payment directly to the prescriber by the plan or
 insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 652, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

683.

(a) A board shall report, within 10 working days, to the State Department of Health Care Services the name and license number of a person whose license has been revoked, suspended, surrendered, made inactive by the licensee, or placed in another category that prohibits the licensee from practicing their profession. The purpose of the reporting requirement is to prevent reimbursement by the state for Medi-Cal and Denti-Cal services provided after the cancellation of a provider’s professional license.

(b) “Board,” as used in this section, means the Dental Board of
 California, the Medical Board of California, the Board of Psychology, the California State Board of Optometry, the California State Board of Pharmacy, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners, the Board of Behavioral Sciences, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, and the California Board of Occupational Therapy.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2015.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 13.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

684.

(a) For the purpose of this section:

(1) “FDA” means the United States Food and Drug Administration.

(2) “HCT/Ps” means human cells, tissues, or cellular or tissue-based products, as defined in Section 1271.3 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended August 31, 2016, as published in the Federal Register (81 Fed. Reg. 60223).

(3) “Stem cell therapy” means a therapy involving the use of HCT/Ps, but shall not include a therapy involving HCT/Ps that meets the criteria set out in Section 1271.10 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended May
 25, 2004, as published in the Federal Register (69 Fed. Reg. 29829), or that qualifies for any of the exceptions described in Section 1271.15 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended May 25, 2004, as published in the Federal Register (69 Fed. Reg. 29829).

(b) (1) A health care practitioner licensed under this division who performs a stem cell therapy that is subject to FDA regulation, but is not FDA-approved, shall communicate to a patient seeking stem cell therapy the following information in English:
“THIS NOTICE MUST BE PROVIDED TO YOU UNDER CALIFORNIA LAW. This health care practitioner performs one or more stem cell therapies that have not been approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration. You are
 encouraged to consult with your primary care physician prior to undergoing a stem cell therapy.”
(2) The information in paragraph (1) shall be communicated to the patient in all of the following ways:

(A) In a prominent display in an area visible to patients in the health care practitioner’s office and posted conspicuously in the entrance of the health care practitioner’s office. These notices shall be at least eight and one-half inches by 11 inches and written in no less than 40-point type.

(B) Prior to providing the initial stem cell therapy, a health care practitioner shall provide the patient with the notice described in paragraph (1) in writing. The notice shall be at least eight and
 one-half inches by 11 inches and written in no less than 40-point type.

(c) This section does not apply to a health care practitioner licensed under this division who has obtained approval or clearance for an investigational new drug, or an investigational device exemption, from the FDA for the use of HCT/Ps.

(d) (1) The licensing board having jurisdiction of the health care practitioner may cite and fine the health care practitioner, not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation of this section.

(2) No citation shall be issued and no fine shall be assessed upon the first complaint against a health care practitioner who violates this section.

(3) Upon a second or subsequent violation of this section, a citation and administrative fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation may be assessed.

(e) The Medical Board of California shall indicate in its annual report, commencing with the 2018–19 annual report, all of the following with regard to licensees who provide stem cell therapies:

(1) The number of complaints received.

(2) Any disciplinary actions taken.

(3) Any administrative actions taken.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 424, Sec. 1.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

686.

A health care practitioner licensed under Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) providing services via telehealth shall be subject to the requirements and definitions set forth in Section 2290.5, to the practice act relating to his or her licensed profession, and to the regulations adopted by a board pursuant to that practice act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 782, Sec. 1.   (AB 1733)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

687.

(a) A healing arts practitioner who is authorized to prescribe, furnish, order, or administer dangerous drugs shall not be subject to a civil or criminal action or disciplinary or other administrative proceeding solely on the basis that the practitioner prescribed, furnished, ordered, or administered brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion for a use that is different from the use for which that drug has been approved for marketing by the United States Food and Drug Administration or that varies from an approved risk evaluation and mitigation strategy pursuant to Section 355-1 of Title 21 of the United States Code, except if the state deems it necessary to address an imminent health or safety
 concern regarding brand name or generic mifepristone.

(b) Pursuant to Sections 1 and 1.1 of Article I of the California Constitution and the Reproductive Privacy Act (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 123460) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code), the authority of a healing arts practitioner to prescribe, furnish, order, or administer brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion is the practice of medicine, and the laws of another state or federal actions that interfere with the ability of a practitioner to prescribe, furnish, order, or administer brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion if that action is lawful under the laws of the state, are against the public policy of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 136, Sec. 3.   (AB 260)   Effective September 26, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

688.

(a) A health care practitioner authorized to issue a prescription pursuant to Section 4040 shall have the capability to issue an electronic data transmission prescription, as defined under Section 4040, on behalf of a patient and to transmit that electronic data transmission prescription to a pharmacy selected by the patient.

(b) (1) A pharmacy, pharmacist, or other practitioner authorized under California law to dispense or furnish a prescription pursuant to Section 4040 shall have the capability to receive an electronic data transmission prescription on behalf of a patient.

(2) A pharmacy, pharmacist, or other
 practitioner authorized under California law to dispense or furnish a prescription pursuant to Section 4040 shall not refuse to dispense or furnish an electronic data transmission prescription solely because the prescription was not submitted via, or is not compatible with, the proprietary software of the pharmacy, pharmacist, or other dispensing practitioner.

(3) A pharmacy, pharmacist, or other practitioner authorized under California law to dispense or furnish a prescription pursuant to Section 4040 may decline to dispense or furnish an electronic data transmission prescription submitted via a software that fails to meet any of the following:

(A) Adheres to the National Council for Prescription Drug Programs SCRIPT standard, as modified from time to time.

(B) Complies with the prescription content requirements set forth in Section 4040.

(C) For a controlled substance prescription, complies with Parts 1300, 1304, 1306, and 1311 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended from time to time.

(D) Complies with the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, the California Confidentiality of Medical Information Act, or the security and confidentiality requirements prescribed to by the pharmacy, pharmacist, or other practitioner authorized pursuant to Section 4040.

(c) For a prescription for a controlled substance, as defined by Section 4021, generation and transmission of the
 electronic data transmission prescription shall comply with Parts 1300, 1304, 1306, and 1311 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended from time to time.

(d) A prescription prescribed by a health care practitioner shall be issued as an electronic data transmission prescription. This subdivision shall not apply to prescriptions issued pursuant to subdivision (e).

(e) Subdivision (d) shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) The prescription is issued pursuant to Section 11159.2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) An electronic data transmission prescription is unavailable due to a temporary technological or electrical failure. For purposes of
 this paragraph, “temporary technological or electrical failure” means failure of a computer system, application, or device, or the loss of electrical power to that system, application, or device, or any other service interruption affecting the certified electronic data transmission prescription application used to transmit the prescription.

(3) The prescribing health care practitioner is issuing a prescription to be dispensed by a pharmacy located outside California.

(4) (A) The prescription is issued in a hospital emergency department or urgent care clinic and one or more of the following conditions are present:

(i) The patient resides outside California.

(ii) The patient resides outside the geographic area of the hospital.

(iii) The patient is homeless or indigent and does not have a preferred pharmacy.

(iv) The prescription is issued at a time when a patient’s regular or preferred pharmacy is likely to be closed.

(B) Under any of the conditions described in subparagraph (A), a prescription shall be electronically issued but does not require electronic transmission and may be provided directly to the patient.

(5) The prescription is issued by a veterinarian.

(6) The prescription is for eyeglasses or contact lenses.

(7) The prescription is issued by a prescribing health care practitioner serving as a volunteer in a free clinic and receives no remuneration for their services.

(8) The prescribing health care practitioner and the dispenser are the same entity.

(9) The prescription is issued by a prescribing health care practitioner under circumstances whereby the practitioner reasonably determines that it would be impractical for the patient to obtain substances prescribed by an electronic data transmission prescription in a timely manner, and the delay would adversely impact the patient’s medical condition.

(10) The prescription that is issued includes elements not covered
 by the latest version of the National Council for Prescription Drug Programs’ SCRIPT standard, as amended from time to time.

(11) (A) The prescriber registers with the California State Board of Pharmacy in a manner and format determined by the board, stating that they meet one or more of the following criteria:

(i) Their practice is located in the area of an emergency or disaster declared by a federal, state, or local government.

(ii) They issue 100 or fewer prescriptions per calendar year.

(iii) They are unable to issue electronic data transmission prescriptions due to circumstances beyond their control.

(B) The prescriber shall annually submit the registration required in subparagraph (A) to the California State Board of Pharmacy and maintain documentation of the circumstances qualifying them for exemption under subparagraph (A).

(C) The California State Board of Pharmacy shall post a list of prescribers meeting the requirements of subparagraph (A) on its internet website.
